Massachusetts, session 194th, H4307.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. To provide for a program of transportation development and improvements, 
the sums set forth in sections 2 and 2A for the several purposes, and subject to the conditions 
specified in this act, are hereby made available, subject to the laws regulating the disbursement 
of public funds. The sums made available in this act shall be in addition to any amounts 
previously appropriated or made available for these purposes.  
SECTION 2.  
MASSACHUSETTS DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 
Highway Division 
6122-2627 For the construction and reconstruction of municipal ways as described in 
clause (b) of the second paragraph of section 4 of chapter 6C of the General Laws; provided, that 
a city or town shall comply with the procedures established by the Massachusetts Department of 
Transportation; provided further, that a city or town may expend, without further appropriation, 

CORRECTED 
of 5 13 for these projects amounts not in excess of the amount provided to the city or town under this 
item upon preliminary notice of such amount, which shall be provided by the department to the 
city or town not later than March 1 of each year; provided further, that the commonwealth shall 
reimburse funds to a city or town under this item, subject to the availability of funds as provided 
in section 9G of chapter 29 of the General Laws, within 30 days after receipt by the department 
of a request for reimbursement from the city or town; provided further, that the department shall 
expend up to $100,000,000 for construction and reconstruction of municipal ways, which shall 
be allocated to municipalities based on local road mileage under procedures established by the 
department; provided further, that the department shall encourage long-term capital plans to be 
developed by a city or town describing how they will use this funding; and provided further, that 
the city or town shall provide to the department its certification by the city or town that actual 
expenses have been incurred on projects eligible for funding under this item and that the work 
has been completed to the satisfaction of the city or town according to the specifications of the 
project plan, and in compliance with applicable laws and procedures established by the 
department................................................................................................................... $300,000,000  
SECTION 2A.  
MASSACHUSETTS DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 
Highway Division 
6121-2617 For the bridge and pavement lifecycle asset management program, including 
but not limited to, design, construction and repair of, or improvements to, non-federally aided 
roadway and bridge projects and for the nonparticipating portion of federally-aided projects, and 
for the construction, reconstruction, resurfacing, repair and improvement of pavement and 

CORRECTED 
of 5 35 surface conditions on non-federally aided roadways, including, but not limited to, state numbered 
routes and municipal roadways; provided, that expenditures from this item may include the costs 
of engineering, design, permitting, climate change adaptation and resilience and other services 
essential to projects under this item; provided further, that funds may be expended from this item 
for matching grants to municipalities related to repair of surface conditions on paved and 
unpaved public ways; provided further, that the department may use these funds for improving 
the condition of bicycle and pedestrian accommodations related to such roadway, bridge, 
pavement and resurfacing projects; and provided further, that the department shall consider 
lifecycle asset management and resilient design with respect to projects under this 
item............................................................................................................................. $500,000,000  
6121-2627 For a program of culvert and small bridge modernization, reconstruction, 
removal, repair, replacement and resilience improvements to culverts and small bridges with a 
span of 20 feet or less under procedures established by the Massachusetts Department of 
Transportation in consultation with the secretary of energy and environmental affairs; provided, 
that expenditures from this item may include the costs of engineering, design, permitting, climate 
change adaptation and resilience and other services essential to projects under this item; and 
provided further, that funds may be expended from this item for matching grants to 
municipalities for municipally-owned small bridges and culverts ............................ $200,000,000  
6121-2637 For a program of transportation capital projects to ease congestion and 
improve safety in the commonwealth; provided, that expenditures from this item may include 
intersection improvements, rail grade crossings, bicycle infrastructure and shared use paths, 
pedestrian walkways and improvements, accessibility improvements, traffic signals and 
technology, ADA compliant sidewalks and crossings, roadway reconstruction and repairs and 

CORRECTED 
of 5 58 other capital investments to alleviate road congestion and improve road, walking and biking 
conditions throughout the commonwealth.................................................................. $185,000,000  
SECTION 3. To meet the expenditures necessary in carrying out section 2, the state 
treasurer shall, upon request of the governor, issue and sell bonds of the commonwealth in an 
amount to be specified by the governor from time to time but not exceeding, in the aggregate, 
$300,000,000. All bonds issued by the commonwealth as aforesaid shall be designated on their 
face, Commonwealth Transportation Improvement Act of 2025, and shall be issued for a 
maximum term of years, not exceeding 30 years, as the governor may recommend to the general 
court under section 3 of Article LXII of the Amendments to the Constitution. Notwithstanding 
section 14 of chapter 29 of the General Laws, all such bonds shall be payable not later than June 
30, 2065, pursuant to said section 3 of said Article LXII. All interest and payments on account of 
principal on these obligations shall be payable from the General Fund or the Commonwealth 
Transportation Fund.   
SECTION 4. To meet the expenditures necessary in carrying out section 2A, the state 
treasurer shall, upon request of the governor, issue and sell bonds of the commonwealth in an 
amount to be specified by the governor from time to time but not exceeding, in the aggregate, 
$885,000,000. All bonds issued by the commonwealth as aforesaid shall be designated on their 
face, Commonwealth Transportation Improvement Act of 2025, and shall be issued for a 
maximum term of years, not exceeding 30 years, as the governor may recommend to the general 
court under section 3 of Article LXII of the Amendments to the Constitution. Notwithstanding 
section 14 of chapter 29 of the General Laws, all such bonds shall be payable not later than June 
30, 2065, pursuant to said section 3 of said Article LXII. All interest and payments on account of 

CORRECTED 
of 5 80 principal on these obligations shall be payable from the General Fund or the Commonwealth 
Transportation Fund.   
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, bonds and 
interest thereon issued under sections 2 and 2A shall be general obligations of the 
commonwealth; provided, however, that any bonds issued by the state treasurer under said 
sections, shall, upon the request of the governor, be issued as special obligation bonds pursuant 
to section 2O of chapter 29 of the General Laws; provided further, that in deciding whether to 
request the issuance of particular bonds as special obligations, the governor shall take into 
account: (i) generally prevailing financial market conditions; (ii) the impact of each approach on 
the overall capital financing plans and needs of the commonwealth; (iii) any ratings assigned to 
outstanding bonds of the commonwealth and any ratings expected to be assigned by any 
nationally-recognized credit rating agency to the bonds proposed to be issued; and (iv) any 
applicable provisions of a trust agreement or credit enhancement agreement entered into pursuant 
to said section 2O of said chapter 29. All interest and payments on account of obligations issued 
under this section as special obligation bonds pursuant to said section 2O of said chapter 29 shall 
be payable from the Commonwealth Transportation Fund, established in section 2ZZZ of said 
chapter 29, solely in accordance with said section 2O of said chapter 29, and such bonds shall 
not be included in the computation of outstanding bonds for purposes of the limit imposed by the 
second paragraph of section 60A of said chapter 29, nor shall debt service with respect to such 
bonds be included in the computation of the limit imposed by section 60B of said chapter 29.